Alabama, session 2026rs, HB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-28-71, Code of Alabama 1975,
providing an alternative process for filling vacancies in any
Etowah County office which occur more than one year before the
expiration of the term of office, is repealed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB330 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 03-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 24-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2